Florida, session 2026, SB1212.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 11 193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 13 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 14 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 15 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 16 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 17 apply. 18 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in this subsection or subsection 19 (8), property assessed under this section shall be assessed at 20 just value as of January 1 of the year following a change of 21 ownership. Thereafter, the annual changes in the assessed value 22 of the property are subject to the limitations in subsections 23 (1) and (2). For the purpose of this section, a change of 24 ownership means any sale, foreclosure, or transfer of legal 25 title or beneficial title in equity to any person, except if any 26 of the following apply: 27 1.âSubsequent to the change or transfer, the same person is 28 entitled to the homestead exemption as was previously entitled 29 and: 30 a.âThe transfer of title is to correct an error; 31 b.âThe transfer is between legal and equitable title or 32 equitable and equitable title and no additional person applies 33 for a homestead exemption on the property; 34 c.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 35 which the owner is listed as both grantor and grantee of the 36 real property and one or more other individuals are additionally 37 named as grantee. However, if any individual who is additionally 38 named as a grantee applies for a homestead exemption on the 39 property, the application is considered a change of ownership; 40 d.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 41 which the owner entitled to the homestead exemption is listed as 42 both grantor and grantee of the real property and one or more 43 other individuals, all of whom held title as joint tenants with 44 rights of survivorship with the owner, are named only as 45 grantors and are removed from the title; or 46 e.âThe person is a lessee entitled to the homestead 47 exemption under s. 196.041(1); 48 2.âLegal or equitable title is changed or transferred 49 between husband and wife, including a change or transfer to a 50 surviving spouse or a transfer due to a dissolution of marriage; 51 3.âThe transfer occurs by operation of law to the surviving 52 spouse or minor child or children under s. 732.401; 53 4.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer is between the 54 owner and another who is a permanent resident and who is legally 55 or naturally dependent upon the owner; or 56 5.âThe transfer occurs with respect to a property where all 57 of the following apply: 58 a.âMultiple owners hold title as joint tenants with rights 59 of survivorship; 60 b.âOne or more owners were entitled to and received the 61 homestead exemption on the property; 62 c.âThe death of one or more owners occurs; and 63 d.âSubsequent to the transfer, the surviving owner or 64 owners previously entitled to and receiving the homestead 65 exemption continue to be entitled to and receive the homestead 66 exemption; or 67 6.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer is between the 68 owner and another who makes the property his or her homestead 69 within 1 year. 70 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 71 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR ___ 72 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 73 specified intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State 74 Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an 75 earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that 76 purpose.